Nebraska, session 109, LB1207.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1207 LB1207
2026 2026
Section 1. Each full-time employee of a school district shall be
allowed five days of mental health leave each school fiscal year. The
employee shall be paid at the employee's usual salary in full for any
mental health leave used by the employee. Mental health leave shall not
count against any other leave the employee accrues as a result of working
for such school district. A school district shall not require or request
any documentation from a medical or mental health provider to justify the
use of mental health leave.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-